test/src/morphology/mhr-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - олма: # -а
    олма+N+Sg+Nom: олма
    олма+N+Sg+Acc: олмам
    олма+N+Sg+Gen: олман
    олма+N+Sg+Ill: олмаш
    олма+N+Sg+Ine: олмаште
    олма+N+Sg+Ela: олмашке
